Indiana, session 2026, SB281.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 6-3.1-34-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
2 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
3 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) In order to facilitate the
4 redevelopment and rehabilitation of property in Indiana that
5 promotes regional collaboration and long term strategic planning,
6 the corporation may commit a tax credit to a development
7 authority pursuant to a development plan approved by the
8 corporation, which may subsequently be awarded by the
9 corporation at the request of a development authority to a
10 taxpayer proposing a qualified investment in a qualified
11 redevelopment site that is included in the development authority's
12 development plan.
13 (b) The corporation shall award fifty million dollars
14 ($50,000,000) to development authorities each fiscal year that may
15 be granted to taxpayers proposing qualified investment in a
16 qualified redevelopment site pursuant to a development plan
17 approved by the corporation.
SB 281—LS 6974/DI 120

2
1 SECTION 2. IC 6-3.1-34-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
2 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
3 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. (a) As used in this chapter,
4 "development authority" refers to a regional development
5 authority established under IC 36-7.5-2-1, IC 36-7.6-2-3, or
6 IC 36-7.7-3-1.
7 (b) For the period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30,
8 2028, the term "development authority" includes a qualified
9 nonprofit organization formed to support economic development
10 across the region and which does not represent a single interest
11 group or local unit or units within a single county. This subsection
12 expires July 1, 2028.
13 SECTION 3. IC 6-3.1-34-2.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
14 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
15 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. (a) As used in this chapter,
16 "development plan" refers to a comprehensive strategic
17 development plan approved by the development authority for its
18 jurisdiction and which outlines its economic development strategy,
19 the anticipated local resource commitments, the proposed
20 regionally significant projects, the return on investment analysis
21 reflecting a positive state return for such projects, the requirement
22 that an equal or greater level of local public financial participation
23 in the aggregate across all projects, the requirement that projects
24 are reasonably expected to spur a total investment across all
25 projects that is four (4) times greater than the level of the state
26 resources provided on a present value basis, and that each project
27 supported would not occur but for the provision of the requested
28 state resources.
29 (b) The development plan shall also include specific, measurable
30 five (5) and ten (10) year objectives, and plans for achieving the
31 objectives, for the region, including targets for:
32 (1) per capita income;
33 (2) population;
34 (3) employment; and
35 (4) credential attainment among residents;
36 in the region.
37 SECTION 4. IC 36-7.6-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2015,
38 SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
39 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A development authority may be established
40 by any of the following:
41 (1) One (1) or more counties and one (1) or more adjacent
42 counties.
SB 281—LS 6974/DI 120

3
1 (2) One (1) or more counties and one (1) or more qualified cities
2 in adjacent counties.
3 (3) One (1) or more qualified cities and one (1) or more qualified
4 cities in adjacent counties.
5 (b) A county or qualified city may participate in the establishment
6 of a development authority under this section and become a member of
7 the development authority only if the fiscal body of the county or
8 qualified city adopts an ordinance authorizing the county or qualified
9 city to participate in the establishment of the development authority.
10 For a county or city that is currently participating in a
11 development authority, the fiscal body of the county or qualified
12 city may adopt a subsequent ordinance authorizing the county or
13 qualified city to change membership and instead participate in a
14 new or different development authority.
15 (c) When a county establishes a development authority with another
16 unit as provided in this chapter, each qualified city and third class city
17 in the county also becomes a member of the development authority,
18 without further action by the qualified city, the third class city, or the
19 development authority.
20 (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a county or
21 municipality may be a member of only one (1) development authority.
22 (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a county or
23 municipality that is a member of the northwest Indiana regional
24 development authority under IC 36-7.5 may not be a member of a
25 development authority under this article.
26 (f) A development authority shall notify the Indiana economic
27 development corporation in writing promptly after the development
28 authority is established or if membership of the development
29 authority changes.
30 SECTION 5. IC 36-7.6-2-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
31 AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
32 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) A development authority may establish a
33 regional development advisory council. The regional development
34 advisory council shall consist of members appointed according the
35 following:
36 (1) One (1) member appointed by the county executive of each
37 county that is a member of the development authority.
38 (2) One (1) member appointed by the governor.
39 (3) Two (2) members appointed by the speaker of the house of
40 representatives.
41 (4) Two (2) members appointed by the president pro tempore
42 of the senate.
SB 281—LS 6974/DI 120

4
1 (5) At least three (3) members appointed by the development
2 authority that are mayors in the development area, with at
3 least (1) appointee residing in a county located in the
4 development area that does not contain a municipality with a
5 population of twenty-five thousand (25,000) or more, if one
6 exists in the development area.
7 (b) A member appointed to the regional development advisory
8 council serves a two (2) year term. A member may be reappointed
9 to subsequent terms.
10 (c) Each member must reside within the development area, but
11 not more than four (4) members may reside in the same county.
12 (d) A majority of the appointed members of a regional
13 development advisory council constitutes a quorum. The
14 affirmative votes of at least a majority of the appointed members
15 of a regional development advisory council are necessary to
16 authorize any action of the regional development advisory council.
17 (e) A member appointed to a regional development advisory
18 council is not entitled to receive any compensation for performance
19 of the member's duties.
20 (f) Not later than October 1 each year, the regional development
21 advisory council shall hold an organizational meeting at which the
22 regional development advisory council shall elect the following
23 officers from the members of the regional development advisory
24 council:
25 (1) A chair.
26 (2) A vice chair.
27 (3) A secretary-treasurer.
28 The affirmative vote of at least a majority of the appointed
29 members of a regional development advisory council is necessary
30 to elect an officer under this subsection. An officer elected under
31 this subsection serves from the date of the officer's election until
32 the officer's successor is elected and qualified.
33 (g) The regional development advisory council shall meet at the
34 call of the chair.
35 (h) This section shall not apply to a development authority
36 established under this article that includes a county listed in
37 IC 36-7-39-2 as a member.
SB 281—LS 6974/DI 120

5
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Tax and Fiscal Policy, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 281, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, delete lines 1 through 17.
Delete pages 2 through 5.
Page 6, delete lines 1 through 2.
Page 6, line 15, delete "two" and insert "three".
Page 6, line 16, delete "($250,000,000)" and insert
"($350,000,000)".
Delete pages 7 through 18.
Page 19, delete lines 1 through 16, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 2. IC 6-3.1-34-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) In order to facilitate the
redevelopment and rehabilitation of property in Indiana that
promotes regional collaboration and long term strategic planning,
the corporation may commit a tax credit to a development
authority pursuant to a development plan approved by the
corporation, which may subsequently be awarded by the
corporation at the request of a development authority to a
taxpayer proposing a qualified investment in a qualified
redevelopment site that is included in the development authority's
development plan.
(b) The corporation shall award fifty million dollars
($50,000,000) to development authorities each fiscal year that may
be granted to taxpayers proposing qualified investment in a
qualified redevelopment site pursuant to a development plan
approved by the corporation.
SECTION 3. IC 6-3.1-34-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. As used in this chapter,
"development authority" refers to a regional development
authority established under IC 36-7.5-2-1, IC 36-7.6-2-3, or
IC 36-7.7-3-1. The term includes a qualified nonprofit organization
formed to support economic development across the region and
which does not represent a single interest group or local unit or
units within a single county.
SECTION 4. IC 6-3.1-34-2.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
SB 281—LS 6974/DI 120

6
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. (a) As used in this chapter,
"development plan" refers to a comprehensive strategic
development plan approved by the development authority for its
jurisdiction and which outlines its economic development strategy,
the anticipated local resource commitments, the proposed
regionally significant projects, the return on investment analysis
reflecting a positive state return for such projects, the requirement
that an equal or greater level of local public financial participation
in the aggregate across all projects, the requirement that projects
are reasonably expected to spur a total investment across all
projects that is four (4) times greater than the level of the state
resources provided on a present value basis, and that each project
supported would not occur but for the provision of the requested
state resources.
(b) The development plan shall also include specific, measurable
five (5) and ten (10) year objectives, and plans for achieving the
objectives, for the region, including targets for:
(1) per capita income;
(2) population;
(3) employment; and
(4) credential attainment among residents;
in the region.
SECTION 5. IC 36-7.6-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2015,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A development authority may be established
by any of the following:
(1) One (1) or more counties and one (1) or more adjacent
counties.
(2) One (1) or more counties and one (1) or more qualified cities
in adjacent counties.
(3) One (1) or more qualified cities and one (1) or more qualified
cities in adjacent counties.
(b) A county or qualified city may participate in the establishment
of a development authority under this section and become a member of
the development authority only if the fiscal body of the county or
qualified city adopts an ordinance authorizing the county or qualified
city to participate in the establishment of the development authority.
For a county or city that is currently participating in a
development authority, the fiscal body of the county or qualified
city may adopt a subsequent ordinance authorizing the county or
qualified city to change membership and instead participate in a
new or different development authority.
SB 281—LS 6974/DI 120

7
(c) When a county establishes a development authority with another
unit as provided in this chapter, each qualified city and third class city
in the county also becomes a member of the development authority,
without further action by the qualified city, the third class city, or the
development authority.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a county or
municipality may be a member of only one (1) development authority.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a county or
municipality that is a member of the northwest Indiana regional
development authority under IC 36-7.5 may not be a member of a
development authority under this article.
(f) A development authority shall notify the Indiana economic
development corporation in writing promptly after the development
authority is established or if membership of the development
authority changes.".
Page 20, delete lines 25 through 29, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 7. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) Notwithstanding
any other provision, after review by the budget committee, the
appropriation for the deal closing fund in P.L.213-2025 (HEA
1001-2025) may be augmented by the budget agency. The terms in
P.L.213-2025 (HEA 1001-2025) for the deal closing fund limiting
augmentation by the budget agency to any economic development
project located within an innovation development district are
repealed.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 281 as introduced.)
HOLDMAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 1.
_____
SENATE MOTION
Mr. President: I move that Senate Bill 281 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 1, delete lines 1 through 17.
Page 2, delete lines 1 through 23.
SB 281—LS 6974/DI 120

8
Page 2, delete lines 41 through 42.
Page 3, delete lines 1 through 7, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 3. IC 6-3.1-34-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. (a) As used in this chapter,
"development authority" refers to a regional development
authority established under IC 36-7.5-2-1, IC 36-7.6-2-3, or
IC 36-7.7-3-1.
(b) For the period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30,
2028, the term "development authority" includes a qualified
nonprofit organization formed to support economic development
across the region and which does not represent a single interest
group or local unit or units within a single county. This subsection
expires July 1, 2028.".
Page 5, delete lines 33 through 41.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to SB 281 as printed January 21, 2026.)
MISHLER
SB 281—LS 6974/DI 120